Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Creation, Administration, and Management of the Assets of the Retirement System

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Legislative Retirement System, Chapter 513-3-1.

47-6-20.
Creation and administration of the retirement system; commencement of operations; corporate powers and privileges; name in which retirement system to transact business.

A retirement system is created and placed under the administration of the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia to provide retirement allowances and other benefits for members of the General Assembly. The system shall begin operation as of July 1, 1967.

The system shall have the power and privileges of a corporation and shall be known as the “Georgia Legislative Retirement System.” By such name all of its business shall be transacted, all of its funds shall be invested, and all of its cash, securities, and other property shall be held.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 2.

47-6-21.
Creation of the office of executive secretary.

There is created an office to be known as the “executive secretary of the Georgia Legislative Retirement System.” The director of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall serve as executive secretary of this system.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 14.

47-6-22.
Powers and duties of the board of trustees.

The general administration and responsibility for the proper operation of the system and for putting this chapter into effect are vested in the board.

The board shall engage such actuarial and other services as shall be required to transact the business of the system.

The board shall designate an actuary who shall be the technical adviser of the board on matters regarding the operation of the system and shall perform such other duties as are required in connection therewith.

At least once in each five-year period following the date of establishment, the actuary shall make an actuarial investigation into the mortality, service, and compensation experience of the members and beneficiaries of the system and shall make a valuation of the contingent assets and liabilities of the system. The board, after taking into account the results of such investigation and valuation, shall adopt for the system such mortality, service, and other tables as shall be deemed necessary.

On the basis of regular interest and tables adopted by the board, the actuaries shall make valuations of the contingent assets and liabilities of the system at least once every three years.

The board shall keep in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for the actuarial valuations of the contingent assets and liabilities of the system and for checking the experience of the system.

The board shall determine, from time to time, the rate of regular interest for use in all calculations, with the rate of 4 percent per annum applicable unless changed by the board.

Subject to the limitations of this chapter, the board shall, from time to time, establish rules and regulations for the administration of the system and for the transaction of business.

The board shall keep a record of all of its proceedings under this chapter, which record shall be open to the public.

All persons employed by the board and the expenses of the board shall be paid from funds appropriated to the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “adviser” for “advisor” in the middle of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-6-23.
Investment powers of board; members’ and employees’ dealings with funds; vouchers for payments.

The board shall be the trustee of the funds of the system; may invest and reinvest such funds; and may hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any of the securities and investments in which any of the funds created under this chapter shall have been invested, as well as the proceeds of such investments and any moneys belonging to such fund, all in such manner as funds of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia are invested and reinvested.

Except as otherwise provided for in this chapter, no member or person employed by the board shall have a direct interest in the gains or profits of any investment made by the board. No member or employee of the board shall, directly or indirectly, for himself or as an agent, in any manner use the funds of the system except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the board; nor shall any member or employee of the board become an endorser, surety, or in any manner an obligor for moneys loaned or borrowed from the board.

The board shall be the custodian of the funds of the system. All payments from such funds shall be made by the board only upon vouchers signed by two persons designated by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, §§ 15, 16; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

47-6-24.
Members’ account; accumulation account; crediting of interest and dividends.

All of the assets of the system shall be credited, according to the purpose for which they are held, to either the members’ account or the accumulation account. The benefits under this chapter and all administrative expenses shall be paid from such accounts.

The members’ account shall be the account in which the contributions made by members and regular interest credited on such amounts shall be held.

The accumulation account shall be the account in which all reserves for the payment of the part of all retirement allowances and other benefits payable from contributions made by the state shall be held and from which all retirement allowances payable under the system and the administrative expenses shall be paid. All interest and dividends earned on the funds of the system shall be credited to the accumulation account.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 17; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 18/HB 460.

47-6-25.
Plan year designated.

For purposes of complying with federal Internal Revenue Service rules and regulations, the plan year for this retirement system shall be the 12 month period beginning on July 1 of each year.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-6-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 25/HB 202.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 11, 2009.